en: Brayer Rollers
xx: Brayer Rollers
cs: Tiskařské válečky
da: Ruller
de: Handroller
es: Rodillo para tinta
fr: Rouleaux Brayer
it: Rulli manuali
ja: ゴムローラー
nl: Drukrollers
no: Håndvalser
pl: Wałki i rolki
pt: Rolos Brayer
ru: Ролики для нанесения краски
sv: Rollers för screentryck
tr: Rulo Merdaneleri

en: Decorative Stamps
xx: Decorative Stamps
cs: Ozdobná razítka
da: Dekorative gummistempler
de: Motivstempel
es: Sellos decorativos
fr: Tampons décoratifs
it: Timbri decorativi
ja: アートスタンプ
nl: Decoratieve stempels
no: Dekorasjonsstempler
pl: Pieczątki ozdobne
pt: Selos decorativos
ru: Декоративные резиновые штампы
sv: Dekorativa gummistämplar
tr: Dekoratif Kaşeler

en: Drafting Compasses
xx: Drafting Compasses
cs: Kružítka
da: Tegning – kompasser
de: Zeichenzirkel
es: Compases
fr: Compas de dessin
it: Compassi per bozze
ja: 製図用コンパス
nl: Passers
no: Passere
pl: Cyrkle
pt: Compassos para desenho
ru: Циркули
sv: Passare
tr: Teknik Resim Pergelleri

en: Screen Printing Squeegees
xx: Screen Printing Squeegees
cs: Stěrky na sítotisk
da: Filmtryk – afstryger
de: Siebdruck-Rakel
es: escurridores para serigrafía
fr: Raclettes d'impression sérigraphique
it: Spatole per serigrafia
ja: スクリーン印刷スキージ
nl: Zeefdrukrakels
no: Silketrykkrakler
pl: Rakle do sitodruku
pt: Rodos de serigrafia
ru: Резиновые валики для нанесения краски
sv: Raklar för screentryck
tr: Serigrafi Lastik Silindirleri

en: Stencil Machines
xx: Stencil Machines
cs: Stroje na výrobu šablon
da: Stencilmaskiner
de: Schablonendruckmaschinen
es: Máquinas de estarcido
fr: Machines à pochoir
it: Macchine per stencil
ja: ステンシルマシン
nl: Stencilmachines
no: Sjablongmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do szablonów
pt: Máquinas estêncil
ru: Трафаретные машины
sv: Stencilmaskiner
tr: Şablon Baskı Makineleri

en: Stencils & Die Cuts
xx: Stencils & Die Cuts
cs: Šablony a razidla
da: Stencils og udskæringer
de: Schablonen & Matrizen
es: Plantillas y tintes
fr: Pochoirs
it: Stencil e stampi
ja: ステンシル・ダイカット
nl: Sjablonen en matrijzen
no: Stensiler og stanser
pl: Szablony i wycinanki
pt: Estêncil e formas pré-cortadas
ru: Трафареты
sv: Stenciler och stansar
tr: Modeller ve Kalıp Kesimler

en: Stitch Markers & Counters
xx: Stitch Markers & Counters
cs: Značkovače a počítadla stehů a oček
da: Stingmærker og -tællere
de: Maschenmarkierer & -zähler
es: marcadores y contadores de puntos
fr: Marqueurs de maille
it: Marcatori e contatori di punti
ja: 目数・段数リング
nl: Steekmarkeerders en stekentellers
no: Maskemarkører og -tellere
pl: Znaczniki i liczniki rzędów
pt: Marcadores e contadores de casas
ru: Маркеры и счетчики стежков
sv: Verktyg för stygnmarkering och stygnräkning
tr: İlmek İşaretleyici ve Sayaçları

en: Textile Art Gauges & Rulers
xx: Textile Art Gauges & Rulers
cs: Šablony a měřidla pro textilní tvorbu
da: Tekstilkunst – målere og linealer
de: Textilkunst-Messgeräte
es: Medidores y reglas para artes textiles
fr: Règles et jauges
it: Calibri e righelli per arte tessile
ja: テキスタイルアート用ゲージ・定規
nl: Meters en linialen voor textielhandwerk
no: Målestokker og linjaler for tekstilkunst
pl: Miary i centymetry krawieckie
pt: Medidores e réguas para arte têxtil
ru: Линейки для текстильного искусства
sv: Mått och linjaler för textilkonst
tr: Tekstil İşçiliği Ölçüm Aleti ve Cetvelleri

en: Wood Burning Tools
xx: Wood Burning Tools
cs: Nástroje pro gravírování dřeva
da: Værktøjer til at brænde i træ
de: Holzbrennwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para quemar madera
fr: Outils de pyrogravure
it: Strumenti per pirografia
ja: 木材焼印用器具
nl: Houdbrandgereedschap
no: Trebrennere
pl: Narzędzia do wypalania w drewnie
pt: Ferramentas para pirogravura
ru: Приспособления для выжигания по дереву
sv: Verktyg för trälödning
tr: Ahşap Yakma Araçları

en: Cutting Mats
xx: Cutting Mats
cs: Řezací podložky
da: Skæremåtter
de: Schneidematten
es: Alfombrillas de corte
fr: Tapis de découpe
it: Tappetini da taglio
ja: カッティングマット
nl: Snijmatten
no: Skjærematter
pl: Maty do cięcia
pt: Bases de corte
ru: Коврики для резки
sv: Skärmattor
tr: Kesme Altlıkları

en: Dress Forms
xx: Dress Forms
cs: Krejčovské panny
da: Giner
de: Schneiderpuppen
es: Maniquíes de costura
fr: Mannequins de couture
it: Manichini per sarte
ja: 人台
nl: Paspoppen
no: Modelldukke
pl: Manekiny krawieckie
pt: Manequins de costura
ru: Манекены для платьев
sv: Provdockor
tr: Prova Mankenleri

en: Felting Pads & Mats
xx: Felting Pads & Mats
cs: Kartáče a podložky na filcování
da: Filtmåtter
de: Filzpolster & -matten
es: Almohadillas y esterillas para enfurtido
fr: Tapis de feutrage
it: Cuscinetti e tappetini per feltratura
ja: 羊毛フェルト用マット
nl: Pads en matten voor vilten
no: Filtputer og -matter
pl: Maty i podkładki do filcowania
pt: Almofadas e placas de feltragem
ru: Коврики для валяния
sv: Filtningsplattor och filtningsmattor
tr: Keçe Sünger ve Altlıkları

en: Frames\, Hoops & Stretchers
xx: Frames\, Hoops & Stretchers
cs: Rámy a obruče pro textilní tvorbu
da: Tekstilkunst – rammer\, bånd og spænderamme
de: Rahmen\, Reifen & Spannvorrichtungen
es: Marcos\, aros y tensores
fr: Cadres\, tambours et châssis
it: Cornici\, cerchi e tenditori per arte tessile
ja: テキスタイルアート用フレーム・フープ
nl: Lijsten\, hoepels en spanramen voor textielhandwerk
no: Rammer og bøyler for tekstilkunst
pl: Ramy\, tamborki i rozpinacze do tkanin
pt: Molduras\, argolas e esticadores
ru: Рамки\, обручи и распорки для текстильного искусства
sv: Ramar\, sybågar och spännramar för textilkonst
tr: Çerçeveler\, Kasnaklar ve Gergiler

en: Glue Guns
xx: Glue Guns
cs: Lepicí pistole
da: Limpistoler
de: Klebepistolen
es: Pistolas de cola
fr: Pistolets à colle
it: Pistole a caldo
ja: グルーガン
nl: Lijmpistolen
no: Limpistoler
pl: Pistolety do kleju
pt: Pistolas de cola
ru: Пистолеты для склеивания
sv: Limpistoler
tr: Silikon Tabancaları

en: Light Boxes
xx: Light Boxes
cs: Prosvětlovací boxy
da: Lyskasser
de: Leuchtkästen
es: Cajas de luz decorativas
fr: Boîtes lumineuses
it: Scatole e tavoli luminosi
ja: ライトボックス
nl: Lichtbakken
no: Lyskasser
pl: Komory bezcieniowe
pt: Painéis de luz
ru: Столы с подсветкой
sv: Ljusbord
tr: Işıklı Kutular

en: Needles & Hooks
xx: Needles & Hooks
cs: Pletací jehly a háčky
da: Nåle og kroge
de: Näh-\, Strick- & Häkelnadeln
es: Agujas y agujas curvas
fr: Aiguilles et crochets
it: Aghi e uncinetti
ja: 針・かぎ針
nl: Naalden en pennen
no: Nåler og kroker
pl: Igły i szydełka
pt: Agulhas e ganchos
ru: Иглы и крючки
sv: Nålar och krokar
tr: İğneler ve Kancalar

en: Crochet Hooks
xx: Crochet Hooks
cs: Pletací háčky
da: Hæklenåle
de: Häkelnadeln
es: Ganchillos
fr: Crochets
it: Uncinetti
ja: かぎ針
nl: Haakpennen
no: Heklenåler
pl: Szydełka
pt: Agulhas de crochê
ru: Вязальные крючки
sv: Virknålar
tr: Dantel Tığları

en: Hand-Sewing Needles
xx: Hand-Sewing Needles
cs: Šicí jehly
da: Synåle
de: Nähnadeln
es: Agujas de coser
fr: Aiguilles à coudre
it: Aghi per cucire
ja: 縫い針
nl: Naainaalden
no: Synåler til håndsying
pl: Igły do szycia
pt: Agulhas de costura
ru: Швейные иглы
sv: Synålar
tr: Dikiş İğneleri

en: Knitting Needles
xx: Knitting Needles
cs: Pletací jehlice
da: Strikkepinde
de: Stricknadeln
es: Agujas de tejer
fr: Aiguilles à tricoter
it: Aghi da maglia
ja: 編み針
nl: Breinaalden
no: Strikkepinner
pl: Druty do szycia
pt: Agulhas de tricô
ru: Вязальные спицы
sv: Sticknålar
tr: Örgü Şişleri

en: Latch & Locker Hooks
xx: Latch & Locker Hooks
cs: Vázací háčky
da: Sammenlåsningskroge
de: Knüpfhaken
es: Ganchos para tapicería
fr: Crochets pour Locker Hooking
it: Uncinetti tunisini
ja: ロッカーフック編み針
nl: Speciale weefhaken voor locker-hooking
no: Vevkroker
pl: Igły smyrneńskie
pt: Ganchos para ponto trancado
ru: Крючки для вязания ковров
sv: Locker hooking-krokar
tr: Dolap Kancaları